Utah statutes.
57-8-13.8.   Contraction of project.
A condominium project may be contracted under the provisions of the
declaration and the provisions of this chapter.  Any such contraction shall be
considered to have occurred at the time of the recordation of an amendment to
the declaration, executed by the declarant, containing a legal description by
metes and bounds of the land withdrawn from the condominium project.  If
portions of the withdrawable land were described pursuant to Subsection
57-8-10(5)(b)(i), then no described portion may be so withdrawn after the
conveyance of any unit on the portion.  If no withdrawable portions were
described, then none of the withdrawable land may be withdrawn after the first
conveyance of any unit on the portion.
